Utah statutes.
55-5-2.   Licensing agency -- Duties of Utah State Office of Rehabilitation.
The Division of Vocational Rehabilitation, Office of Public Instruction, is
designated as the licensing agency for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this act, and shall
(1)  Take such steps as are necessary and proper to carry out the provisions
of this act.
(2)  With the approval of the custodian having charge of the building, park or
other property in which the vending stand or other enterprise is to be
located, select a location for such stand or enterprise and the type of
equipment to be provided.
(3)  Construct and equip stands at such place as may be deemed advisable where
blind persons may be trained under the supervision of the Division of
Vocational Rehabilitation to carry on a business as a vending stand operator.
(4)  Provide adequate supervision of such persons licensed to operate vending
stands or other enterprises to ensure efficient and orderly management
thereof.
(5)  Prescribe such rules and regulations as are necessary for the proper
operation of such vending stands or other enterprises.
